Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5884.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-23.3-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-23.3 entitled
"Nontransparent Windshields and Windows" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-23.3-4. Exemptions.
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Motor vehicles manufactured with windshields and window glass areas equipped in
accordance with specifications of 49 CFR 571.205 as authorized by 15 U.S.C. § 1407.
(2) Motor vehicles owned or leased by federal, state and local law enforcement agencies.
(3) The use of nontransparent or sunscreen material or window application on motor
vehicles which has a total visible light transmittance of not less than seventy percent (70%)
measured perpendicular to the surface of the glass on the windshield and side windows immediately
adjacent to the right and left of the operator’s seat, the side windows immediately to the rear of the
operator’s seat and the front passenger seat or on the rear window if the vehicle is equipped with
two (2) outside mirrors, one on each side, adjusted so that the driver has a clear view of the highway
behind the vehicle.
(4) The use of any transparent material limited to the uppermost six inches (6") along the
top of the windshield, provided the strip does not encroach upon the driver’s direct forward viewing
area as more particularly described and defined in applicable Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards.

(5) Motor vehicles not required to be registered in this state.
(6) The use of sunscreen material on windows behind the driver in trucks, buses, trailers,
mobile homes, campers, multipurpose vehicles, charter buses, funeral service vehicles, or
limousines, provided that the vehicle is equipped with two (2) outside mirrors, one on each side, if
those mirrors meet federal standards adjusted so the driver has a clear view of the highway behind
the vehicle.
(7) A motor vehicle registered in this state in the name of a person, or the person’s legal
guardian, who has an affidavit signed by a physician or an optometrist licensed to practice in this
state that states that the person has a physical condition that makes it necessary to equip the motor
vehicle with a sunscreening device which may exceed federal standards. The division of motor
vehicles, upon application of the individual, which shall include the affidavit, shall issue a sticker
to be applied to the driver’s side window to identify this exemption.
(8) Any motor vehicle, registered and garaged within this state, whose sole purpose is to
provide executive security to persons within this state. The owner(s) of the vehicle shall first seek
and obtain written permission from the local police chief where the vehicle is garaged and
registered before the waiver is granted.
(9) Any motor vehicle registered in this state owned and operated by a member of the
Rhode Island judiciary.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002035
========
LC002035 - Page 2 of 3